Utah statutes.
53-8-206.   Safety inspection -- Station requirements -- Permits not
transferable -- Certificate of inspection -- Fees -- Unused certificates --
Suspension or revocation of permits.
(1)  The safety inspection required under Section 53-8-205 may only be
performed:
(a)  by a person certified by the division as a safety inspector; and
(b)  at a safety inspection station with a valid safety inspection station
permit issued by the division.
(2)  A safety inspection station permit may not be assigned or transferred or
used at any location other than a designated location, and every safety
inspection station permit shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the
location designated.
(3)  If required by the division, a record and report shall be made of every
safety inspection and every safety inspection certificate issued.
(4)  A safety inspection station holding a safety inspection station permit
issued by the division may charge:
(a)  a fee as reimbursement for the safety inspection certificate fee as
specified in Subsection 53-8-204(1)(e); and
(b)  a reasonable fee for labor in performing safety inspections, not to
exceed:
(i)  $7 or less for motorcycles and street-legal all-terrain vehicles;
(ii)  unless Subsection (4)(b)(i) or (iii) applies, $15 or less for motor
vehicles; or
(iii)  $20 or less for 4-wheel drive, split axle, and any motor vehicles that
necessitate disassembly of front hub or removal of rear axle for inspection.
(5)  A safety inspection station may return unused safety inspection
certificates in a quantity of 10 or more and shall be reimbursed by the
division for the cost of the safety inspection certificates.
(6) (a)  Upon receiving notice of the suspension or revocation of a safety
inspection station permit, the safety inspection station permit holder shall
immediately terminate all safety inspection activities and return all safety
inspection certificates and the safety inspection station permit to the
division.
(b)  The division shall issue a receipt for all unused safety inspection
certificates.
